Washington statutes.
RCW 43.102.090

Criminal justice training commission—Collaboration—Trainings.

(1) The criminal justice training commission shall collaborate with the office to ensure office investigators receive sufficient training to attain the necessary requirements to conduct investigations under the jurisdiction of the office.

(2) The investigators of the office shall receive priority registration to criminal justice training commission trainings necessary to conduct investigations as required by this chapter.

[ 2021 c 318 s 309.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 318: See note following RCW 43.102.020.